District of Columbia statutes.
42-1701

Purposes.

The purposes of this subchapter are to protect the public against incompetence, fraud and deception in real estate transactions; to establish a Real Estate Guaranty and Educational Fund to compensate victims of unlawful real estate practices; and for other purposes.

History

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-209, § 2, 30 DCR 390
Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-117, § 2(a), 31 DCR 4023
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1233(a), 46 DCR 3142

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-321.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1921.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of chapter to District of Columbia Housing Authority: Section 13 of D.C. Law 10-243, the District of Columbia Housing Authority Act of 1994, provided:

Applicability of chapter to District of Columbia Housing Authority: (a) The provisions of Chapter 17 of Title 42 shall not apply to the property managers of housing properties within the jurisdiction of the Authority. The activities of property managers of housing properties shall be regulated by the applicable statutes, rules, and regulations of the United States in effect on March 21, 1995.

“(b) Execution or other judicial process shall not issue against the real property of the Authority nor shall any judgment against the Authority be a charge or lien upon its real property. This section shall not apply to or limit the right of obligees to foreclose or otherwise enforce any mortgage on property of the Authority or the right of obligees to pursue any remedies for the enforcement of any pledge or lien given by the Authority on its rents, fees, and revenues.”